Utah statutes.
23-23-11.   Failure to comply with rules and requirements.

A person shall leave private property within a cooperative wildlife management unit immediately, upon request of a landowner, landowner association operator, or cooperative wildlife management unit agent, if that person:

(1)  does not have in that person's possession a cooperative wildlife management unit authorization or permit;

(2)  endangers or has endangered human safety;

(3)  damages or has damaged private property within a cooperative wildlife management unit; or

(4)  fails or has failed to comply with reasonable rules of a landowner association.

